Nevada, session 83, SB384.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 3.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.310 1. Except as otherwise provided in [this] subsection [,]
2, the judge of each district court may appoint a bailiff for the court
in counties polling 4,500 or more votes. In counties polling less than
4,500 votes, the judge may appoint a bailiff with the concurrence of
the sheriff. In each case, the bailiff serves at the pleasure of the
judge whom the bailiff serves.
2. Subject to the provisions of subsections [2, 4] 3, 5 and [10,]
11, in a county whose population is 700,000 or more [, the] :
(a) The judge of each district court [may] shall appoint [a
deputy marshal] for the court a deputy marshal instead of a bailiff.
[In each case, the bailiff or]
(b) Before the judge appoints a deputy marshal, the judge shall
first consider whether there are any qualified and available county
employees to serve in the position. After the judge appoints a
deputy marshal, regardless of whether the person is a county
employee when appointed, the deputy marshal shall be deemed to
be a county employee, except that:
(1) The deputy marshal serves at the pleasure of the judge
[he or she] whom the deputy marshal serves [.
2.] ; and
(2) The rules and policies that apply to other county
employees do not apply to the deputy marshal during his or her
service, unless otherwise provided by the judge.
-
*SB384*

– 3 –
(c) If the judge ends the service of the deputy marshal in the
district court of that judge for any reason that does not violate any
applicable federal or state law or public policy governing such
service, the deputy marshal has no right to serve in that district
court, but the deputy marshal remains a county employee and his
or her continued employment is subject to the rules and policies
that apply to other county employees, including, without
limitation, the rules and policies that govern reassignment,
transfer, discharge, demotion or discipline.
3. In all judicial districts where there is more than one judge,
there may be a number of bailiffs or deputy marshals at least equal
to the number of judges, and in any judicial district where a circuit
judge has presided for more than 50 percent of the regular judicial
days of the prior calendar year, there may be one additional bailiff
or deputy marshal, each bailiff or deputy marshal to be appointed by
the joint action of the judges [.] , subject to the provisions of
subsection 2 in a county whose population is 700,000 or more. If
the judges cannot agree upon the appointment of any bailiff or
deputy marshal within 30 days after a vacancy occurs in the [office]
position of bailiff or deputy marshal, then the appointment must be
made by a majority of the board of county commissioners.
[3.] 4. Each bailiff or deputy marshal shall:
(a) Preserve order in the court.
(b) Attend upon the jury.
(c) Open and close court.
(d) Perform such other duties as may be required of him or her
by the judge of the court.
[4.] 5. The bailiff or deputy marshal must be a qualified
elector of the county and shall give a bond, to be approved by the
district judge, in the sum of $2,000, conditioned for the faithful
performance of his or her duty.
[5.] 6. The compensation of each bailiff or deputy marshal for
his or her services must be fixed by the board of county
commissioners of the county and his or her salary paid by the
county wherein he or she is appointed, the same as the salaries of
other county officers or employees are paid.
[6.] 7. The board of county commissioners of the respective
counties shall allow the salary stated in subsection [5] 6 as other
salaries are allowed to county officers [,] or employees, and the
county auditor shall draw his or her warrant for it, and the county
treasurer shall pay it.
[7.] 8. The provisions of this section do not:
(a) Authorize the bailiff or deputy marshal to serve any civil or
criminal process, except such orders of the court which are specially
-
*SB384*

– 4 –
directed by the court or the presiding judge thereof to him or her for
service.
(b) Except in a county whose population is 700,000 or more,
relieve the sheriff of any duty required of him or her by law to
maintain order in the courtroom.
[8. If a]
9. The deputy marshal [is] appointed for a court pursuant to
subsection [1,] 2 must attend each session of the court . [must be
attended by the deputy marshal.
9.] 10. For good cause shown, a deputy marshal appointed for
a court pursuant to subsection [1] 2 may be assigned temporarily to
assist other judicial departments or assist with court administration
as needed.
[10.] 11. A person appointed to be a deputy marshal for a
court pursuant to subsection [1] 2 must be certified by the Peace
Officers’ Standards and Training Commission as a category I peace
officer not later than 18 months after appointment.
Sec. 2. NRS 4.353 is hereby amended to read as follows:
4.353 1. Subject to the provisions of subsections 2, 4 and 10,
in a county whose population is 700,000 or more [, the] :
(a) The justice of the peace for each justice court [may] shall
appoint [a deputy marshal] for the court a deputy marshal instead of
a bailiff.
(b) Before the justice of the peace appoints a deputy marshal,
the justice of the peace shall first consider whether there are any
qualified and available county employees to serve in the position.
After the justice of the peace appoints a deputy marshal,
regardless of whether the person is a county employee when
appointed, the deputy marshal shall be deemed to be a county
employee, except that:
(1) The deputy marshal serves at the pleasure of the justice of
the peace [that] whom the deputy marshal serves [.] ; and
(2) The rules and policies that apply to other county
employees do not apply to the deputy marshal during his or her
service, unless otherwise provided by the justice of the peace.
(c) If the justice of the peace ends the service of the deputy
marshal in the justice court of that justice of the peace for any
reason that does not violate any applicable federal or state law or
public policy governing such service, the deputy marshal has no
right to serve in that justice court, but the deputy marshal remains
a county employee and his or her continued employment is subject
to the rules and policies that apply to other county employees,
including, without limitation, the rules and policies that govern
reassignment, transfer, discharge, demotion or discipline.
-
*SB384*

– 5 –
2. In all townships where there is more than one justice of the
peace, there may be a number of deputy marshals at least equal to
the number of justices of the peace. If the justices of the peace
cannot agree upon the appointment of any deputy marshal within 30
days after a vacancy occurs in the [office] position of deputy
marshal, the appointment must be made by a majority of the board
of county commissioners.
3. Each deputy marshal shall:
(a) Preserve order in the court.
(b) Open and close court.
(c) Perform other such duties as may be required of the deputy
marshal by the justice of the peace of the court.
4. The deputy marshal must be a qualified elector of the county
and shall give bond, to be approved by the justice of the peace, in
the sum of $2,000, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or
her duty.
5. The compensation of each deputy marshal for his or her
services must be fixed by the board of county commissioners of the
county and the deputy marshal’s salary paid by the county wherein
he or she is appointed, the same as the salaries of other county
officers or employees are paid.
6. The board of county commissioners of the respective
counties shall allow the salary stated in subsection 5 as other salaries
are allowed to county officers [,] or employees, and the county
auditor shall draw his or her warrant for it, and the county treasurer
shall pay it.
7. The provisions of this section do not authorize the deputy
marshal to serve any civil or criminal process, except such orders of
the court which are specially directed by the court or the presiding
justice of the peace thereof to the deputy marshal for service.
8. [If a] The deputy marshal [is] appointed for a court pursuant
to subsection 1 [,] must attend each session of the court . [must be
attended by the deputy marshal.]
9. For good cause shown, a deputy marshal appointed for a
court pursuant to subsection 1 may be assigned temporarily to assist
other justice courts or assist with court administration as needed.
10. A person appointed to be a deputy marshal pursuant to
subsection 1 must be certified by the Peace Officers’ Standards and
Training Commission as a category I peace officer not later than 18
months after appointment.
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 4. This act does not apply to any employment action
taken before the effective date of this act.
-
*SB384*

– 6 –
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB384*